Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLI Laws
Rules of Codification

446.250.
Conflicting amendments — Last enactment to prevail.

In the event of a conflict between
measures amending the same section of statutes, the one which passes the General Assembly last shall prevail. For purposes of codification only, a House bill shall be deemed to have passed the General Assembly when signed by the President
of the Senate and a Senate bill shall be deemed to have passed the General
Assembly when signed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 1, effective February 5, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.3.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Termination of Parental Rights and Adoption, § 29.1.

446.260.
Repeal
to prevail over amendment of same statute.

In the event of a conflict between
a measure amending a statute and one repealing the same statute, the bill
repealing the statute shall prevail unless the bill amending the statute specifically
repeals the previous repeal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 2, effective February 5, 1982.

446.270.
Effect
of failure to underline new language in amended statute.

In the event material is placed
in a bill amending a statute which is not underlined and which is not contained
in the original text of the statute, the material shall be considered as extraneous
and shall have no force and effect and shall be deleted from any publication
of the statutes by the statute reviser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 3, effective February 5, 1982.

446.280.
Effect
of failure to indicate deleted material by brackets and strike through.

In the event material which
was in the original text of a statute is deleted from the statute in a bill
amending the statute but is not indicated by brackets and strike through,
the deletion shall be considered in error and shall have no force and effect
and shall be retained in any publication of statutes by the statute reviser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 4, effective February 5, 1982.

446.290.
Effect
of delayed repeal.

In the event a bill with a delayed
effective date repeals a statute amended at the same session of the General Assembly, the statute shall be considered to be amended at the date specified
in the amending act and shall stand repealed as of the date specified in the
repealing act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 5, effective February 5, 1982.

446.300.
Effect
of delayed amendment.

In the event a bill with a delayed
effective date amends a statute repealed at the same session of the General
Assembly, the repeal shall prevail and the amendment shall have no force and
effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 6, effective February 5, 1982.

446.310.
Procedure
for technical correction on face of bill to be presented to Governor.

When the House or Senate clerk
or a member of his staff makes a change or correction on the face of the bill
to be presented to the Governor for his approval or other action, he shall
deliver a copy of the bill containing the change to the statute reviser and
shall affix his signature and the date of making the change on the face of
the original bill and the copy sent to the statute reviser in a position near
the changed material. Any change not so indicated and signed shall be null
and void and shall not be placed in the statutes by the statute reviser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 7, effective February 5, 1982.

446.320.
Amendment
of section with delayed effective date.

When the General Assembly amends
a section of the statutes which, due to a delayed effective date at the time
of enactment, is not effective when the amendment is enacted, such amendment
shall not hasten the effective date of the statute, unless the General Assembly
has clearly indicated that such is its intention by a change in the effective
date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 2, § 8, effective February 5, 1982.

446.350.
Prohibition upon government substantially burdening freedom of religion — Showing of compelling governmental interest — Description of “burden.”

Government shall not substantially burden a person’s freedom of religion. The right to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious belief may not be substantially burdened unless the government proves by clear and convincing evidence that it has a compelling governmental interest in infringing the specific act or refusal to act and has used the least restrictive means to further that interest. A “burden” shall include indirect burdens such as withholding benefits, assessing penalties, or an exclusion from programs or access to facilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 111, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.